District of Columbia statutes.
1-1327

Surveyor to certify and record location of party wall.

The Surveyor or a registered surveyor shall ascertain and certify, and the Surveyor may put on record, at the request and expense of any person interested therein, the fact of the occupation of land by a party wall, as mentioned in § 1-1326.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1426, ch. 854, § 1588
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 5005(e), 46 DCR 3142
1973 Ed., § 1-627.
1981 Ed., § 1-927.